Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,156
Restated articles of incorporation.

(MBCA 10.07) (a) A corporation's
board of directors may restate its articles of incorporation at any time,
with or without shareholder approval, to consolidate all amendments into a
single document.

(b) If the restated articles
include one or more new amendments that require shareholder approval, the
amendments must be adopted and approved as provided in section 21-2,152.

(c) A corporation that
restates its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State
for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation
and the text of the restated articles of incorporation together with a certificate
which states that the restated articles consolidate all amendments into a
single document and, if a new amendment is included in the restated articles,
also includes the statements required under section 21-2,155.

(d) Duly adopted restated
articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation
and all amendments thereto.

(e) The Secretary of State may certify restated articles
of incorporation as the articles of incorporation currently in effect without
including the certificate information required by subsection (c) of this section.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 156.